West Virginia, session 2026, HB5028.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 2P. Small Town Main Street Recovery Act. §5B-2P-1. Small Town Main Street Recovery Program. (a) The Department of Economic Development shall provide grants for facade improvements, small business assistance, and broadband upgrades in municipalities under 25,000 population.(b) Applications supported by municipal governments in coordination with county commissions or regional development authorities shall receive priority consideration.